Vermont, session 2025-2026, H276.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. SHORT TITLE
This act may be cited as the “Vermont Climate Resilience and State
Wildlands Act.”
Sec. 2. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds:
(1) The planet is facing the consequences of climate change and the
catastrophic loss of biodiversity, both globally and locally.
(2) Intact and connected ecosystems reduce flood risks, mitigate
drought, sequester and store carbon, and support Vermont’s biodiversity and
clean water.
VT LEG #379419 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.276
2025 Page 2 of 9
(3) Vermont’s most effective and efficient contribution to conserving
biological diversity and maintaining a landscape resilient to climate change is
to conserve an intact and connected landscape.
(4) The Department of Fish and Wildlife, working within the Agency of
Natural Resources and with Vermont conservation organizations, has
developed Vermont Conservation Design, a framework to sustain the State’s
ecologically functional landscape into the future.
(5) Vermont Conservation Design finds that:
(A) historically, the vast majority of Vermont’s landscape was old
forest, and it is the original habitat condition for many species;
(B) the State’s native flora and fauna that have been here prior to
European settlement are adapted to this landscape of old, structurally complex
forest punctuated by natural disturbance gaps and occasional natural openings
such as wetlands or rock outcrops;
(C) the complex physical structure of old forests creates diverse
habitats, many of which are absent or much less abundant in younger forests;
(D) as a result of the persistent structural and vegetative complexity
above ground and the diverse biome belowground and associated complex
biotic and abiotic relationships that develop over time, old forests also protect
water quality, sequester and store carbon, provide opportunities for adaptation
of species and community relationships to climate and other environmental
VT LEG #379419 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.276
2025 Page 3 of 9
changes, and set an ecological benchmark against which to measure active
management of Vermont’s forests;
(E) although there are small patches of old forest scattered around the
state, old forest is absent in Vermont as a functional component of the
landscape;
(F) allowing about nine percent of Vermont’s forest to become old
forest will bring this missing component back to Vermont’s landscape and
offer confidence that species that benefit from or depend on this condition can
persist; and
(G) in most forests, passive restoration will result in old forest
conditions.
(6) Only approximately four percent of Vermont and three percent of
New England are managed as ecological reserves as defined in 10 V.S.A.
chapter 89, to assist with restoration of old forests.
(7) State lands provide only two percent of Vermont’s average annual
timber harvest volume.
(8) Ninety percent of State lands are located in forested headwater
settings, which are particularly susceptible to generating runoff during storm
events, given their topography and geologic setting.
VT LEG #379419 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.276
2025 Page 4 of 9
(9) 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 59 called for prioritizing ecological
reserve areas to protect highest priority natural communities and maintain or
restore old forests.
(10) To meet the goals of 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 59, the State of
Vermont requires a statutory landscape designation to facilitate the
establishment of ecological reserves on State lands.
Sec. 3. 10 V.S.A. chapter 90 is created:
CHAPTER 90. STATE WILDLANDS
§ 2810. PURPOSE
The purpose of this chapter is to ensure, for the benefit of current and future
generations of Vermonters, and for the entire community of life in the Green
Mountain State, an enduring resource of publicly owned wildlands.
§ 2811. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Conversion” has the same meaning as in section 2801 of this title.
(2) “Core area” means an administrative land management designation
used by the Agency of Natural Resources in Long Range Management Plans
for State lands.
(3) “Highest priority natural communities and habitat features” means
conservation targets, critical for an ecologically functional landscape, that are
identified in the Agency of Natural Resource’s Vermont Conservation Design.
VT LEG #379419 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.276
2025 Page 5 of 9
(4) “Land Management Classification 1.0, Highly Sensitive
Management” means an administrative land management designation used by
the Agency of Natural Resources in Long Range Management Plans for State
lands.
(5) “Land Management Classification 4.0, Intensive Management”
means an administrative land management designation used by the Vermont
Agency of Natural Resources in Long Range Management Plans for State
lands.
(6) “Natural area” has the same meaning as in section 2607 of this title.
(7) “Skiable line” means the path taken by a skier or rider as they ski
through trees or around obstacles.
(8) “Wildlands” means a land management designation within the
category of Ecological Reserves as defined in section 2802 of this title, of any
size and current condition, permanently protected from conversion and
explicitly intended and managed to allow natural processes to prevail.
§ 2812. DESIGNATION OF STATE WILDLANDS
The following areas are designated as State wildlands, except as described
in section 2814 of this chapter:
(1) all State-managed natural areas and core areas;
(2) all areas designated as Land Management Classification 1.0, Highly
Sensitive Management as of January 1, 2025;
VT LEG #379419 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.276
2025 Page 6 of 9
(3) all highest priority natural communities and habitat features
identified by Vermont Conservation Design on State lands;
(4) Bomoseen State Park;
(5) Camel’s Hump State Park;
(6) Coolidge State Park;
(7) Elmore State Park;
(8) Green River Reservoir State Park;
(9) Mt. Ascutney State Park;
(10) New Discovery State Park;
(11) Camel’s Hump State Forest;
(12) CC Putnam State Forest;
(13) Coolidge, Jeffords, and Aitken State Forests;
(14) Groton State Forest;
(15) Jay State Forest;
(16) Long Trail State Forest;
(17) LR Jones State Forest;
(18) Mt. Carmel State Forest;
(19) Mt. Mansfield State Forest;
(20) Okemo State Forest;
(21) Townshend State Forest;
(22) Victory State Forest;
VT LEG #379419 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.276
2025 Page 7 of 9
(23) Willoughby State Forest; and
(24) Levi Pond Wildlife Management Area.
§ 2813. MANAGEMENT OF STATE WILDLANDS
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Agency
of Natural Resources (ANR) shall manage State wildlands as follows:
(1) The areas shall be permanently protected from conversion.
(2) ANR shall allow natural processes to prevail with minimal human
interference.
(3) There shall be no vegetation management, including timber
harvesting, pruning, cutting, herbicide application, salvage logging, or removal
of diseased or infected trees.
(4) There shall be no alteration of surface waters, groundwater, or
wetlands, including damming, draining, filling, diverting, or channelizing.
(b) This chapter shall not govern the Agency of Natural Resources’
management of:
(1) trail-based recreation;
(2) existing Class A and B roads as of January 1, 2025, designated
according to Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation Policy #13;
(3) designated backcountry ski zones, as of January 1, 2025, where
vegetation may be managed to maintain existing skiable lines;
VT LEG #379419 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.276
2025 Page 8 of 9
(4) hunting, fishing, foraging, gathering medicines, or practicing
ceremony; and
(5) vegetation management in areas not listed in section 2812 of this
chapter or designated pursuant to section 2815 of this chapter.
(c) Nothing in this chapter shall prevent the State from authorizing
measures required to respond to emergencies involving the health and safety of
persons.
§ 2814. EXCLUSIONS
The following lands are excluded from wildlands designation in section
2812 of this chapter:
(1) areas designated in a long-range management plan as of January 1,
2025 as Land Management Classification 4.0, Intensive Management;
(2) areas within a Management Unit for which a long-range
management plan does not exist, or for which the long-range management plan
predates the Agency of Natural Resources Land Management Classification
designations, but which meet the definition and intent for Land Management
Classification 4.0, Intensive Management; and
(3) any areas where management as a wildland is legally precluded by
deed or easement.
VT LEG #379419 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.276
2025 Page 9 of 9
§ 2815. FUTURE DESIGNATION OF WILDLANDS
(a) Upon future acquisition of parcels that adjoin any areas listed in section
2812 of this chapter, or that are separated from those areas only by a road or
right-of-way, the Agency of Natural Resources shall manage those areas as
wildlands unless, after an opportunity for public comment and public hearing,
based on substantial evidence, the Agency finds that doing so would not be
consistent with the purpose of this chapter.
(b) Upon acquisition of future parcels that do not adjoin any areas listed in
section 2812 of this chapter, or that are not separated from those areas only by
a road or right-of-way, the Agency of Natural Resources shall inventory the
qualities and characteristics of the acquired areas and shall manage these areas
as wildlands if doing so would be consistent with the purpose of this chapter.
(c) The State shall not refuse to purchase or accept donated areas with a
conservation easement, including forever-wild easements, without just cause.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379419 v.2